South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3285.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Continuing law enforcement education credits SECTION 1.    Chapter 23, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-23-57.    A law enforcement officer certified in this State is required to complete Continuing Law Enforcement Education Credits (CLEEC) in autism spectrum disorder. The number of required annual CLEEC hours shall be determined by the council. Autism spectrum disorder training courses SECTION 2.    Section 44-61-80(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) The department shall develop and approve educational standards for the necessary classification of emergency medical technicians and approve the training program for the necessary classifications of emergency medical technicians. The training program must include courses in autism spectrum disorder for each classification. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________